Utah statutes.
16-10a-804.   Election of directors by certain classes of shareholders.

If the articles of incorporation authorize dividing the shares into classes or series, the articles of incorporation may also authorize the election of all or a specified number or portion of directors by the holders of one or more authorized classes or series of shares.  A class or series of shares entitled to elect one or more directors is a separate voting group for purposes of the election of directors.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

